nb: Elektronikk > Tilbehør til spillkonsoller > Tilbehør til hjemmespillkonsoller: Hjemmekonsoll-etuier og oppbevaring; Hjemmekonsollkontrollere; Hjemmekonsoll minne og lagringsenheter; Hjemmekonsoll strømforsyninger; Hjemmekonsoll reservedeler; Trekk til hjemmespillkonsoller; Hjemmekonsoll-stativer og fester
hu: Elektronika > Videojátékkonzol-kiegészítők > Otthoni játékkonzol-kiegészítők: Otthoni játékkonzoltokok és -tárolók; Otthoni játékkonzol-vezérlők; Otthoni játékkonzol-memória és -tárolóeszközök; Otthoni játékkonzol-tápegységek; Otthoni játékkonzol-cserealkatrészek; Otthoni játékkonzol-huzatok; Otthoni játékkonzol-állványok és -tartók
de: Elektronik > Zubehör für Videospielkonsolen > Zubehör für Spielkonsolen: Spielkonsolenhüllen und -Aufbewahrung; Heimspielkonsolen-Controller; Heimspielkonsolen-Speicher und -Speichermedien; Heimspielkonsolen-Netzteile; Heimspielkonsolen-Ersatzteile; Spielekonsolen für Zuhause - Masken; Heimspielkonsolen-Ständer und -Halterungen
hr-HR: Elektronika > Dodaci za konzole za video igre > Dodaci za kućne igraće konzole: Futrole i spremišta za kućne igraće konzole; Kontroleri za kućne igraće konzole; Memorije i uređaji za pohranu za kućne igraće konzole; Napajanja za kućne igraće konzole; Zamjenski dijelovi za kućne igraće konzole; Navlake za kućnu igraću konzolu; Stalci i nosači za kućne igraće konzole
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за конзоли за видеоигри > Аксесоари за домашни игрови конзоли: Калъфи и съхранение за домашна игрова конзола; Контролери за домашна игрова конзола; Памет и устройства за съхранение за домашна игрова конзола; Захранвания за домашна игрова конзола; Резервни части за домашна игрова конзола; Обложки за домашни игрови конзоли; Стойки и стативи за домашна игрова конзола
it: Elettronica > Accessori console videogiochi > Accessori console di gioco: Custodie e contenitori per console di gioco domestiche; Controller per console di gioco domestiche; Dispositivi di memoria e archiviazione per console di gioco domestiche; Alimentatori per console di gioco domestiche; Parti di ricambio per console di gioco domestiche; Skin per console di gioco domestiche; Supporti e staffe per console di gioco domestiche
tr: Elektronik > Video Oyun Konsolu Aksesuarları > Ev Oyun Konsolu Aksesuarları: Ev Oyun Konsolu Kılıfları ve Saklama Üniteleri; Ev Oyun Konsolu Oyun Kumandaları; Ev Oyun Konsolu Bellek ve Depolama Cihazları; Ev Oyun Konsolu Güç Kaynakları; Ev Oyun Konsolu Yedek Parçaları; Ev Oyun Konsolu Kaplamaları; Ev Oyun Konsolu Stantları ve Montaj Aparatları
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor videogameconsoles > Accessoires voor gameconsole voor thuis: Thuisgameconsole hoezen en opslag; Thuisgameconsole controllers; Thuisgameconsole geheugen en opslagapparaten; Thuisgameconsole voedingen; Thuisgameconsole reserveonderdelen; Skins voor gameconsole voor thuis; Thuisgameconsole statieven en bevestigingen
sl-SI: Elektronika > Dodatki za igralne konzole > Dodatki za domače igralne konzole: Etuiji in shranjevanje za domače igralne konzole; Krmilniki za domače igralne konzole; Pomnilniške in shranjevalne naprave za domače igralne konzole; Napajalni viri za domače igralne konzole; Nadomestni deli za domače igralne konzole; Nalepke za domače igralne konzole; Stojala in nosilci za domače igralne konzole
da: Elektronik > Videospilkonsol – tilbehør > Hjemmespilkonsol – tilbehør: Etuier og opbevaring til spilkonsoller; Controllere til spilkonsoller; Hukommelses- og lagringsenheder til spilkonsoller; Strømforsyninger til spilkonsoller; Reservedele til spilkonsoller; Hjemmespilkonsol – betræk; Stativer og beslag til spilkonsoller
sk-SK: Elektronika > Príslušenstvo pre konzoly na videohry > Príslušenstvo k domácej hernej konzole: Púzdra a úložné priestory pre domáce herné konzoly; Ovládače domácich herných konzol; Pamäťové a úložné zariadenia pre domáce herné konzoly; Napájacie zdroje domácich herných konzol; Náhradné diely domácich herných konzol; Skiny domácej hernej konzoly; Stojany a držiaky domácich herných konzol
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ κονσολών βιντεοπαιχνιδιών > Αξεσουάρ οικιακών κονσολών παιχνιδιών: Θήκες & αποθήκευση οικιακής κονσόλας παιχνιδιών; Χειριστήρια οικιακής κονσόλας παιχνιδιών; Μνήμη & συσκευές αποθήκευσης οικιακής κονσόλας παιχνιδιών; Τροφοδοτικά οικιακής κονσόλας παιχνιδιών; Ανταλλακτικά οικιακής κονσόλας παιχνιδιών; Καλύμματα οικιακών κονσολών παιχνιδιών; Βάσεις & στηρίγματα οικιακής κονσόλας παιχνιδιών
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์คอนโซลวิดีโอเกม > อุปกรณ์เสริมเครื่องเกมคอนโซล: กระเป๋าและที่เก็บเครื่องเกมคอนโซลในบ้าน; จอยคอนโทรลเลอร์เครื่องเกมคอนโซลในบ้าน; หน่วยความจำและอุปกรณ์จัดเก็บข้อมูลเครื่องเกมคอนโซลในบ้าน; อะแดปเตอร์เครื่องเกมคอนโซลในบ้าน; ชิ้นส่วนทดแทนเครื่องเกมคอนโซลในบ้าน; สกินเกมคอนโซลในบ้าน; ขาตั้งและขายึดเครื่องเกมคอนโซลในบ้าน
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires pour consoles de jeu vidéo > Accessoires pour consoles de jeu de salon: Étuis et rangements pour console de jeu de salon; Contrôleurs pour console de jeu de salon; Mémoire et dispositifs de stockage pour console de jeu de salon; Alimentations pour console de jeu de salon; Pièces de rechange pour console de jeu de salon; Apparences de console de jeu de salon; Supports et fixations pour console de jeu de salon
ko: 전자기기 > 비디오 게임 콘솔 부대용품 > 가정용 게임 콘솔 부대용품: 홈 게임 콘솔 케이스 및 보관함; 홈 게임 콘솔 컨트롤러; 홈 게임 콘솔 메모리 및 저장 장치; 홈 게임 콘솔 전원 공급 장치; 홈 게임 콘솔 교체 부품; 가정용 게임 콘솔 스킨; 홈 게임 콘솔 스탠드 및 마운트
ja: 電子機器 > ゲーム機関連用品 > 家庭用テレビゲーム機関連用品: 家庭用ゲーム機ケースと収納; 家庭用ゲーム機コントローラー; 家庭用ゲーム機メモリーと記憶装置; 家庭用ゲーム機電源; 家庭用ゲーム機交換部品; 家庭用ゲーム機のスキン; 家庭用ゲーム機スタンドとマウント
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria do gier wideo > Akcesoria do domowych konsol do gier: Etui i przechowywanie konsol gier domowych; Kontrolery konsol gier domowych; Urządzenia pamięci i magazynowania konsol gier domowych; Zasilacze konsol gier domowych; Części zamienne konsol gier domowych; Nakładki na domowe konsole do gier; Stojaki i uchwyty konsol gier domowych
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для игровых консолей > Аксессуары для стационарных игровых консолей: Кейсы и хранилища для домашних игровых консолей; Контроллеры для домашних игровых консолей; Устройства памяти и хранения для домашних игровых консолей; Блоки питания для домашних игровых консолей; Запасные части для домашних игровых консолей; Декоративные чехлы и наклейки для стационарных игровых консолей; Подставки и крепления для домашних игровых консолей
sv: Elektronik > Tillbehör till dataspelskonsoler > Tillbehör till hemdataspelkonsoler: Hemkonsolväskor och -förvaring; Hemkonsolkontroller; Hemkonsolminnes- och lagringsenheter; Strömförsörjning för hemspelkonsoler; Ersättningsdelar till hemspelkonsoler; Spelkonsolskinn för hemmabruk; Hemkonsolstativ och -fästen
es: Electrónica > Accesorios para videoconsolas > Accesorios para consolas de sobremesa: Estuches y almacenamiento de consola de videojuegos; Controles de consola de videojuegos; Memoria y dispositivos de almacenamiento de consola de videojuegos; Fuentes de alimentación de consola de videojuegos; Partes de repuesto de consola de videojuegos; Máscaras para consolas de sobremesa; Soportes y monturas de consola de videojuegos
lt-LT: Elektronika > Vaizdo žaidimų konsolių priedai > Namų žaidimų konsolių priedai: Namų žaidimų konsolių dėklai ir saugyklos; Namų žaidimų konsolių valdikliai; Namų žaidimų konsolių atminties ir saugojimo įrenginiai; Namų žaidimų konsolių maitinimo šaltiniai; Namų žaidimų konsolių pakaitinės dalys; Namų žaidimų konsolių apvalkalai; Namų žaidimų konsolių stovai ir tvirtinimai
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện bảng điều khiển giao tiếp trò chơi điện tử > Phụ kiện máy chơi game tại nhà: Vỏ bảo vệ và lưu trữ máy chơi game; Bộ điều khiển máy chơi game; Thiết bị lưu trữ và bộ nhớ máy chơi game; Nguồn điện máy chơi game; Linh kiện thay thế máy chơi game; Miếng dán máy chơi game tại nhà; Giá và giá gắn máy chơi game
en: Electronics > Video Game Console Accessories > Home Game Console Accessories: Home Game Console Cases & Storage; Home Game Console Controllers; Home Game Console Memory & Storage Devices; Home Game Console Power Supplies; Home Game Console Replacement Parts; Home Game Console Skins; Home Game Console Stands & Mounts
fi: Elektroniikka > Videopelikonsolien lisätarvikkeet > Kodin pelikonsolitarvikkeet: Kotipelikonsolin kotelo ja säilytys; Kotipelikonsolin ohjain; Kotipelikonsolin muisti- ja tallennuslaite; Kotipelikonsolin virtalähde; Kotipelikonsolin varaosa; Kodin pelikonsolien kalvot; Kotipelikonsolin teline ja kiinnike
cs: Elektronika > Herní konzole – příslušenství > Domácí herní konzole – příslušenství: Pouzdra a úložiště domácích herních konzolí; Ovladače domácích herních konzolí; Paměti a úložná zařízení domácích herních konzolí; Napájecí zdroje domácích herních konzolí; Náhradní díly domácích herních konzolí; Domácí herní konzole – skiny; Stojany a držáky domácích herních konzolí
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para consoles de videogame > Acessórios para consoles caseiros: Estojos e armazenamento para console de jogos doméstico; Controles para console de jogos doméstico; Dispositivos de memória e armazenamento para console de jogos doméstico; Fontes de alimentação para console de jogos doméstico; Peças de reposição para console de jogos doméstico; Skins para console caseiros; Suportes e suportes para console de jogos doméstico
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii pentru console de jocuri video > Accesorii pentru console de jocuri: Huse și dispozitive de stocare pentru console de jocuri; Controlere pentru console de jocuri; Memorie și dispozitive de stocare pentru console de jocuri; Surse de alimentare pentru console de jocuri; Piese de schimb pentru console de jocuri; Skinuri pentru console de jocuri; Suporturi și montaje pentru console de jocuri
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電動遊戲機配件 > 家庭電視遊樂器配件: 家用遊戲機盒及儲存; 家用遊戲機控制器; 家用遊戲機記憶體及儲存裝置; 家用遊戲機電源供應器; 家用遊戲機替換零件; 家用電視遊樂器外殼; 家用遊戲機架及安裝架
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios de consola de videojogos > Acessórios de consola de jogos em casa: Estojos e armazenamento de consola de jogos doméstica; Comandos de consola de jogos doméstica; Memória e dispositivos de armazenamento de consola de jogos doméstica; Fontes de alimentação de consola de jogos doméstica; Peças de substituição de consola de jogos doméstica; Capas para consolas de jogos em casa; Suportes e montagens de consola de jogos doméstica
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子游戏机配件 > 家用游戏机配件: 家用游戏机保护壳和收纳盒; 家用游戏机手柄; 家用游戏机内存和存储设备; 家用游戏机电源; 家用游戏机替换部件; 家用游戏机保护罩; 家用游戏机支架